Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 1. County Boundaries
§ 18-1-101.
Counties named, boundaries.

Albany county is that portion of the state of Wyoming within the following boundaries: commencing at a point on the south boundary of Wyoming, where a line projected south from the north one-quarter corner of section six (6), township twelve (12) north, range seventy (70) west, through the centers of sections and through one-quarter corners intersects said boundary; thence north to the north one-quarter corner of section six (6), township twelve (12) north, range seventy (70) west; thence along the third (3rd) standard parallel to the south one-quarter corner of section thirty-one (31), township thirteen (13) north, range seventy (70) west; thence north, through the centers of sections and through one-quarter corners to the north one-quarter corner of section six (6), township sixteen (16) north, range seventy (70) west; thence along the fourth (4th) standard parallel to the south one-quarter of section thirty-one (31), township seventeen (17) north, range seventy (70) west; thence north through the centers of sections, and through one-quarter corners, to the north one-quarter corner of section six (6), township twenty (20) north, range seventy (70) west; thence along the fifth (5th) standard parallel to the southeast corner of section thirty-one (31), township twenty-one (21) north, range seventy (70) west; thence north along section lines to the northeast corner of section six (6), township twenty-four (24) north, range seventy (70) west; thence along the sixth (6th) standard parallel to the southeast corner of section thirty-one (31), township twenty-five (25) north, range seventy (70) west; thence north along section lines to the northeast corner of section six (6), township twenty-eight (28) north, range seventy (70) west; thence west along the township line between townships twenty-eight (28) and twenty-nine (29) north, to the north quarter corner of section two (2), township twenty-eight (28) north, range seventy-one (71) west; thence south through the center of section two (2) to the south quarter corner of said section two (2); thence west along section line to the northwest corner of section eleven (11), township twenty-eight (28) north, range seventy-one (71) west; thence south along section line to the southwest corner of section eleven (11), township twenty-eight (28) north, range seventy-one (71) west; thence west along section line to the north quarter corner of section fifteen (15), township twenty-eight (28) north, range seventy-one (71) west; thence south to the south quarter corner of section twenty-two (22), township twenty-eight (28) north, range seventy-one (71) west; thence west along section line to northwest corner of section twenty-seven (27), township twenty-eight (28) north, range seventy-one (71) west; thence south on section line to the southwest corner of section ten (10), township twenty-seven (27) north, range seventy-one (71) west; thence west along section line to the northwest corner of section sixteen (16), township twenty-seven (27) north, range seventy-one (71) west; thence south along section lines to the southwest corner of section twenty-one (21), township twenty-seven (27) north, range seventy-one (71) west; thence west along section lines to south quarter corner of section nineteen (19), township twenty-seven (27) north, range seventy-two (72) west; thence north along center section line to the center of section nineteen (19), township twenty-seven (27) north, range seventy-two (72) west; thence west along center section lines to southeast corner of the southwest quarter (SW 1/4) of northeast quarter (NE 1/4) of section twenty-one (21), township twenty-seven (27) north, range seventy-three (73) west; thence north on subdivision line to northeast corner of northwest quarter (NW 1/4) of the northeast quarter (NE 1/4) of section twenty-one (21), township twenty-seven (27) north, range seventy-three (73) west; thence west along section line to southeast corner of section seventeen (17), township twenty-seven (27) north, range seventy-three (73) west; thence north along section line to northeast corner of section twenty-nine (29), township twenty-eight (28) north, range seventy-three (73) west; thence east along section line to southeast corner of section twenty-two (22), township twenty-eight (28) north, range seventy-three (73) west; thence north to northeast corner of section fifteen (15), township twenty-eight (28) north, range seventy-three (73) west; thence east along section line to the southeast corner of section eleven (11), township twenty-eight (28) north, range seventy-three (73) west; thence north along section lines to northeast corner of section two (2), township twenty-eight (28) north, range seventy-three (73) west; thence west along the seventh (7th) standard parallel to the north quarter corner of section four (4), township twenty-eight (28) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence south through the centers of sections and through one-quarter corners to the south one-quarter corner of section thirty-three (33), township twenty-five (25) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence along the sixth (6th) standard parallel to the northeast corner of section five (5), township twenty-four (24) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence south along section lines to the southeast corner of section thirty-two (32), township twenty-one (21) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence along the fifth (5th) standard parallel to the north one-quarter corner of section five (5), township twenty (20) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence south through the centers of sections and through one-quarter corners to the south one-quarter corner of section thirty-two (32), township seventeen (17) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence west along the fourth (4th) standard parallel to the northwest corner of section six (6), township sixteen (16) north, range seventy-nine (79) west; thence south on the range line between ranges seventy-nine (79) and eighty (80) west, to the third (3rd) standard parallel; thence along the third (3rd) standard parallel to the northwest corner of section six (6), township twelve (12) north, range seventy-nine (79) west; thence south along the range line between ranges seventy-nine (79) and eighty (80) west, to the south boundary of the state of Wyoming; thence east along said south boundary of the state of Wyoming to the point of beginning.

Big Horn county is that portion of the state of Wyoming within the following boundaries: beginning at the southeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township forty-nine (49) north, range eighty-six (86) west; thence north along the range line between ranges eighty-five (85) and eighty-six (86) west to the intersection of the said range line with the line along the divide between the Big Horn River and the streams flowing easterly from the Big Horn Mountains; thence northerly and northwesterly along said divide to the northern boundary of the state of Wyoming; thence west along the northern boundary of the state of Wyoming to the point of intersection between said boundary and the range line between ranges ninety-seven (97) and ninety-eight (98) west; thence south along said range line to the fourteenth (14th) standard parallel; thence along said fourteenth (14th) standard parallel to the northwest corner of section six (6), township fifty-six (56) north, range ninety-seven (97) west; thence south along the range line between ranges ninety-seven (97) and ninety-eight (98) west to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township fifty-three (53) north, range ninety-seven (97) west; thence along the thirteenth (13th) standard parallel to the northwest corner of section six (6), township fifty-two (52) north, range ninety-seven (97) west; thence south along the range line between ranges ninety-seven (97) and ninety-eight (98) west to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township forty-nine (49) north, range ninety-seven (97) west; thence east along the twelfth (12th) standard parallel to the point of beginning.

Campbell county is that portion of the state of Wyoming within the following boundaries: commencing at a point on the northern boundary of the state of Wyoming where the range line between ranges sixty-eight (68) and sixty-nine (69) west intersects said boundary; thence west along said northern boundary of the state of Wyoming to a point where it is intersected by a line projected north, through the centers of sections and through one-quarter corners, from the south one-quarter corner of section thirty-three (33), township fifty-seven (57) north, range seventy-six (76) west; thence south through centers of sections and through one-quarter corners to the south-one-quarter corner of section thirty-three (33), township fifty-seven (57) north, range seventy-six (76) west; thence along the fourteenth (14th) standard parallel to the north one-quarter corner of section four (4), township fifty-six (56) north, range seventy-six (76) west; thence south through the centers of sections and through one-quarter corners to the south one-quarter corner of section thirty-three (33), township fifty-three (53) north, range seventy-six (76) west; thence along the thirteenth (13th) standard parallel to the northwest corner of section four (4), township fifty-two (52) north, range seventy-six (76) west; thence south along section lines to the southwest corner of section thirty-three (33), township forty-nine (49) north, range seventy-six (76) west; thence along the twelfth (12th) standard parallel to the northwest corner of section four (4), township forty-eight (48) north, range seventy-six (76) west; thence south along section lines to the southwest corner of section thirty-three (33), township forty-five (45) north, range seventy-six (76) west; thence along the eleventh (11th) standard parallel to the north one-quarter corner of section five (5), township forty-four (44) north, range seventy-six (76) west; thence south through the centers of sections and through one-quarter corners to the center of section twenty-nine (29), township forty-one (41) north, range seventy-six (76) west; thence east through the centers of sections and through one-quarter corners to the east one-quarter corner of section twenty-five (25), township forty-one (41) north, range sixty-nine (69) west; thence north along the range line between ranges sixty-eight (68) and sixty-nine (69) west to the northeast corner of section one (1), township forty-four (44) north, range sixty-nine (69) west; thence along the eleventh (11th) standard parallel to the southeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township forty-five (45) north, range sixty-nine (69) west; thence north along the range line between ranges sixty-eight (68) and sixty-nine (69) west to the northeast corner of section one (1), township forty-eight (48) north, range sixty-nine (69) west; thence along the twelfth (12th) standard parallel to the southeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township forty-nine (49) north, range sixty-nine (69) west; thence north along the range line between ranges sixty-eight (68) and sixty-nine (69) west to the northeast corner of section one (1), township fifty-two (52) north, range sixty-nine (69) west; thence along the thirteenth (13th) standard parallel to the southeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township fifty-three (53) north, range sixty-nine (69) west; thence north along the range line between ranges sixty-eight (68) and sixty-nine (69) west to the northeast corner of section one (1), township fifty-six (56) north, range sixty-nine (69) west; thence along the fourteenth (14th) standard parallel to the southeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township fifty-seven (57) north, range sixty-nine (69) west; thence north along the range line between ranges sixty-eight (68) and sixty-nine (69) west to the point of beginning.

Carbon county is that portion of the state of Wyoming within the following boundaries: commencing at a point on the south boundary of the state of Wyoming where the range line between ranges seventy-nine (79) and eighty (80) west intersects said boundary; thence north to the third (3rd) standard parallel; thence along said third (3rd) standard parallel to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township thirteen (13) north, range seventy-nine (79) west; thence north on the range line between ranges seventy-nine (79) and eighty (80) west, to the northwest corner of section six (6), township sixteen (16) north, range seventy-nine (79) west; thence east along the fourth (4th) standard parallel to the south one-quarter corner of section thirty-two (32), township seventeen (17) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence north through the centers of sections and through one-quarter corners to the north one-quarter corner of section five (5), township twenty (20) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence along the fifth (5th) standard parallel to the southeast corner of section thirty-two (32), township twenty-one (21) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence north along section lines to the northeast corner of section five (5), township twenty-four (24) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence along the sixth (6th) standard parallel to the south one-quarter corner of section thirty-three (33), township twenty-five (25) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence north through the centers of sections and through one-quarter corners to the north one-quarter corner of section four (4), township twenty-eight (28) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence west along the seventh (7th) standard parallel to the northwest corner of section six (6), township twenty-eight (28) north, range eighty-nine (89) west; thence; south on the line between ranges eighty-nine (89) and ninety (90) west to the southeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township twenty-five (25) north, range ninety (90) west; thence along the sixth (6th) standard parallel to the northwest corner of section six (6), township twenty-four (24) north, range eighty-nine (89) west; thence south along the range line between ranges eighty-nine (89) and ninety (90) west to the southeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township twenty-one (21) north, range ninety (90) west; thence along the fifth (5th) standard parallel to the northeast corner of section three (3), township twenty (20) north, range ninety (90) west; thence south along section lines to the southeast corner of section thirty-four (34), township twenty (20) north, range ninety (90) west; thence west along the township line between townships nineteen (19) and twenty (20) north, to the northwest corner of section six (6), township nineteen (19) north, range ninety-three (93) west; thence south along the range line between ranges ninety-three (93) and ninety-four (94) west to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township seventeen (17) north, range ninety-three (93) west; thence along the fourth (4th) standard parallel to the northwest corner of section six (6), township sixteen (16) north, range ninety-three (93) west; thence south on the range line between ranges ninety-three (93) and ninety-four (94) west to the third (3rd) standard parallel; thence along the third (3rd) standard parallel to the northwest corner of section six (6), township twelve (12) north, range ninety-three (93) west; thence south on the range line between ranges ninety-three (93) and ninety-four (94) west to the southern boundary of the state of Wyoming; thence east along the said southern boundary of the state of Wyoming to the point of beginning.

Converse county is that portion of the state of Wyoming within the following boundaries: beginning at the east one-quarter corner of section twenty-eight (28), township forty-one (41) north, range sixty-seven (67) west; thence west through the centers of sections and through one-quarter corners to the center of section twenty-six (26), township forty-one (41) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence south to the south one-quarter corner of section thirty-five (35), township forty-one (41) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence along the tenth (10th) standard parallel to the northeast corner of section three (3), township forty (40) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence south along section lines to the southeast corner of section thirty-four (34), township thirty-seven (37) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence along the ninth (9th) standard parallel to the north one-quarter corner of section three (3), township thirty-six (36) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence south through the centers of sections and through one-quarter corners to the north one-quarter corner of section thirty-four (34), township thirty-three (33) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence south on center line of section thirty-four (34) to the southwest corner of lot one (1), section thirty-four (34), thence west on the north line of tract forty-four (44), section thirty-four (34), to the northwest corner thereof, thence south on the west line of tract forty-four (44), section thirty-four (34), township thirty-three (33) north, range seventy-seven (77) west, to the southwest corner thereof; thence south along the east line of lots eleven (11), thirteen (13), fourteen (14), eighteen (18) and tract fifty-two (52), section four (4), township thirty-two (32) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence south along the east line of tract fifty-two (52), lots three (3), four (4), six (6), and tract fifty-nine (59), section nine (9); thence south along the east line of tract fifty-nine (59) and lot three (3) to the southwest corner of tract fifty-eight (58), thence east on south line of tract fifty-eight (58) to the northwest corner of lot four (4), thence south on the east line of lot three (3), section sixteen (16); thence south along the east line of lots one (1), two (2), three (3), four (4), section twenty-one (21); thence south along the east line of lot four (4) to the point of intersection on the north boundary of lot “A”, tract seventy-eight (78), thence east along the north boundary of lot “A” to the northeast corner thereof, thence south along the east line of lot “A” to the southeast corner thereof, thence west along the south line of lot “A” to the southwest corner of lot “A”, tract seventy-eight (78); thence south along the west line of lots three (3), four (4), five (5), section twenty-eight (28); thence south on the west line of lot one (1), section thirty-three (33) to the northeast corner of tract ninety-seven (97) “B”, thence east along the north line of lot “A”, tract ninety-seven (97) to the northeast corner thereof, thence south on the east line of tract ninety-seven (97) to the southeast corner thereof, thence west on the south line of tract ninety-seven (97) to the east line of lot six (6), thence south on the east line lot six (6) to the township line, all being in township thirty-two (32) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence west on the township line to the north one-quarter corner of section four (4), township thirty-one (31) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence south through the centers of sections and through one-quarter corners to the south one-quarter corner of section thirty-three (33), township twenty-nine (29) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence east on the township line between township twenty-eight (28) and twenty-nine (29) north to the northwest corner of section one (1), township twenty-eight (28) north, range seventy-three (73) west; thence south on section lines to southwest corner of section twelve (12), township twenty-eight (28) north, range seventy-three (73) west; thence west along section line to northwest corner of section fourteen (14), township twenty-eight (28) north, range seventy-three (73) west; thence south along section line to southwest corner of section twenty-three (23), township twenty-eight (28) north, range seventy-three (73) west; thence west along section line to northwest corner of section twenty-eight (28) in township twenty-eight (28) north, range seventy-three (73) west; thence south along section lines to southwest corner of section sixteen (16), township twenty-seven (27) north, range seventy-three (73) west; thence east along section line to northwest corner of northeast quarter (NE 1/4) of northeast quarter (NE 1/4) of section twenty-one (21), township twenty-seven (27) north, range seventy-three (73) west; thence south along subdivision lines to southwest corner of southeast quarter (SE 1/4) of northeast quarter (NE 1/4) of section twenty-one (21), township twenty-seven (27) north, range seventy-three (73) west; thence east along center of sections to center of section nineteen (19), township twenty-seven (27) north, range seventy-two (72) west; thence south along center section line to south quarter corner of section nineteen (19), township twenty-seven (27) north, range seventy-two (72) west; thence east along section lines to southeast corner of section twenty (20), township twenty-seven (27) north, range seventy-one (71) west; thence north along section lines to southwest corner of section nine (9), township twenty-seven (27) north, range seventy-one (71) west; thence east along section line to southeast corner of section nine (9), township twenty-seven (27) north, range seventy-one (71) west; thence north along section lines to southwest corner of section twenty-two (22), township twenty-eight (28) north, range seventy-one (71) west; thence east along section line to south quarter corner of section twenty-two (22), township twenty-eight (28) north, range seventy-one (71) west; thence north along center of sections to north quarter corner of section fifteen (15), township twenty-eight (28) north, range seventy-one (71) west; thence east along section lines to southeast corner of section ten (10), township twenty-eight (28) north, range seventy-one (71) west; thence north along section lines to northeast corner of section ten (10), township twenty-eight (28) north, range seventy-one (71) west; thence east on section lines to south quarter corner of section two (2), township twenty-eight (28) north, range seventy-one (71) west; thence north through center of sections to the north quarter corner of section two (2), township twenty-eight (28) north, range seventy-one (71) west; thence east along the seventh (7th) standard parallel between townships twenty-eight (28) and twenty-nine (29) north, to the southeast corner of section thirty-one (31), township twenty-nine (29) north, range seventy (70) west; thence north along section lines to the northeast corner of section six (6), township thirty (30) north, range seventy (70) west; thence east along the township line between townships thirty (30) and thirty-one (31) north, to the southeast corner of section thirty-three (33), township thirty-one (31) north, range sixty-seven (67) west; thence north along section lines to the point of beginning.

Crook county is that portion of the state of Wyoming within the following boundaries: commencing at a point on the eastern boundary of the state of Wyoming where said boundary is intersected by the township line between townships forty-eight (48) and forty-nine (49) north; thence north to the northeastern corner of the state of Wyoming; thence west along the northern boundary of the state of Wyoming to a point on said boundary where the same is intersected by a line between ranges sixty-eight (68) and sixty-nine (69) west; thence south along said range line to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township fifty-seven (57) north, range sixty-eight (68) west; thence along the fourteenth (14th) standard parallel to the northwest corner of section six (6) township fifty-six (56) north, range sixty-eight (68) west; thence south along the range line between ranges sixty-eight (68) and sixty-nine (69) west to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township fifty-three (53) north, range sixty-eight (68) west; thence along the thirteenth (13th) standard parallel to the northwest corner of section six (6), township fifty-two (52) north, range sixty-eight (68) west; thence south along the range line between ranges sixty-eight (68) and sixty-nine (69) west to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township forty-nine (49) north, range sixty-eight (68) west; thence east along the twelfth (12th) standard parallel to the point of beginning.

Fremont county is that portion of the state of Wyoming within the following boundaries: commencing at the southeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township twenty-seven (27) north, range ninety (90) west; thence north along the range line between ranges eighty-nine (89) and ninety (90) west to the northeast corner of section one (1), township twenty-eight (28) north, range ninety (90) west; thence along the seventh (7th) standard parallel to the southeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township twenty-nine (29) north, range ninety (90) west; thence north along the range line between ranges eighty-nine (89) and ninety (90) west to the northeast corner of section one (1), township thirty-two (32) north, range ninety (90) west; thence along the eighth (8th) standard parallel to the southwest corner of section thirty-four (34), township thirty-three (33) north, range eighty-nine (89) west; thence north along section lines to the northwest corner of section three (3), township thirty-six (36) north, range eighty-nine (89) west; thence along the ninth (9th) standard parallel to the southwest corner of section thirty-four (34), township thirty-seven (37) north, range eighty-nine (89) west; thence north along section lines to the northwest corner of section three (3), township forty (40) north, range eighty-nine (89) west; thence along the tenth (10th) standard parallel to the southwest corner of section thirty-four (34), township forty-one (41) north, range eighty-nine (89) west; thence north to the northwest corner of section twenty-seven (27), township forty-one (41) north, range eighty-nine (89) west; thence west along section lines to the northwest corner of section thirty (30), township forty-one (41) north, range eighty-nine (89) west; thence south along the range line between ranges eighty-nine (89) and ninety (90) west to the southeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township forty-one (41) north, range ninety (90) west; thence west along the tenth (10th) standard parallel to the west boundary line of range ninety-four (94) west sixth (6th) principal meridian; thence south along said boundary line to the north line of section thirty-four (34), township six (6) north, range six (6) east, Wind River meridian; thence west along section lines to the northwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township six (6) north, range five (5) east, W. R. M.; thence north along the range line between ranges four (4) and five (5) east, to the northeast corner of section twenty-five (25), township six (6) north, range four (4) east, W. R. M.; thence west along section lines to the northwest corner of section thirty (30), township six (6) north, range four (4) east, W. R. M.; thence north along the range line between ranges three (3) and four (4) east to the northeast corner of section thirteen (13), township six (6) north, range three (3) east, W. R. M.; thence west along section lines to the northwest corner of section eighteen (18), township six (6) north, range three (3) east, W. R. M.; thence north along the range line between ranges two (2) and three (3) east to the northeast corner of section one (1), township six (6) north, range two (2) east, W. R. M.; thence west along the township line between townships six (6) and seven (7) north to the northeast corner of section one (1), township six (6) north, range one (1), east, W. R. M.; thence north along the range line between ranges one (1) and two (2) east to the northeast corner of section twenty-four (24), township seven (7) north, range one (1) east, W. R. M.; thence west along section lines to the northwest corner of section nineteen (19), township seven (7) north, range one (1) east W. R. M.; thence north along the Wind River meridian to the northeast corner of section twelve (12), township seven (7) north, range one (1) west W. R. M.; thence west along section lines to the northwest corner of section seven (7), township seven (7) north, range one (1) west W. R. M.; thence north along the range line between ranges one (1) and two (2) west to the northeast corner of section one (1), township seven (7) north, range two (2) west W. R. M.; thence west along the township line between townships seven (7) and eight (8) north to the northeast corner of section one (1), township seven (7) north, range four (4) west, W. R. M.; thence north along the range line between ranges three (3) and four (4) west to the intersection of said range line with middle line of the south fork of Owl Creek, thence northwesterly along the middle of said south fork of Owl Creek to the divide between the water sheds of Wind River and tributaries and the Greybull River and tributaries; thence westerly along the divide between said water sheds to the divide between the drainage basin of the Columbia River and the drainage basin of the Missouri River; thence northwesterly along said divide to its intersection with the line projected north along section lines from the southeast corner of section thirty-three (33), township forty-five (45) north, range one hundred ten (110) west sixth (6th) principal meridian; thence south along section lines to the southeast corner of section thirty-three (33), township forty-five (45) north, range one hundred ten (110) west; thence along the eleventh (11th) standard parallel to the northeast corner of section four (4), township forty-four (44) north, range one hundred ten (110) west; thence south along section lines to the southeast corner of section thirty-three (33), township forty-one (41) north, range one hundred ten (110) west; thence along the tenth (10th) standard parallel to the northwest corner of section six (6), township forty (40) north, range one hundred seven (107) west; thence south along the range line between ranges one hundred seven (107) and one hundred eight (108) west to the intersection of said range line with the divide between the Missouri River drainage and the Green River drainage; thence southeasterly along said divide to its intersection with the township line between townships thirty-one (31) and thirty-two (32) north, thence east along said township line to the northwest corner of section six (6), township thirty-one (31) north, range one hundred two (102) west; thence south along the range line between ranges one hundred two (102) and one hundred three (103) west to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township twenty-nine (29) north, range one hundred two (102) west; thence along the seventh (7th) standard parallel to the northwest corner of section six (6), township twenty-eight (28) north, range one hundred two (102) west; thence south along the range line between ranges one hundred two (102) and one hundred three (103) west to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township twenty-seven (27) north, range one hundred two (102) west; thence east along the township line between townships twenty-six (26) and twenty-seven (27) north to the point of beginning.

Goshen county is that portion of the state of Wyoming within the following boundaries: commencing at a point on the boundary line between the state of Wyoming and the state of Nebraska, where the township line between townships thirty (30) and thirty-one (31) north intersects said boundary line, and running thence south along the said boundary line, between the state of Wyoming and the state of Nebraska, to township line between eighteen (18) and nineteen (19) north; thence west on said township line to the section line between sections thirty-three (33) and thirty-four (34), in township nineteen (19), north range sixty-five (65) west of sixth principal meridian; thence north along the middle section line of range sixty-five (65) to its intersection with the north boundary line of Laramie county; thence east along said county boundary line to the place of beginning.

Hot Springs county is that portion of the state of Wyoming within the following boundaries: beginning at the northwest corner of township forty-seven (47) north of range ninety-nine (99) west; thence south along the range line between ranges ninety-nine (99) and one hundred (100) west, to the northeast corner of township forty-six (46) north of range one hundred (100) west, thence west along the township line, between townships forty-six (46) and forty-seven (47) west; to the northwest corner of township forty-six (46) north of range one hundred (100) west; thence south along the range line between ranges one hundred (100) and one hundred one (101) west; to the northeast corner of township forty-five (45) north of range one hundred one (101) west; thence west along the township line, between townships forty-five (45) and forty-six (46), north to the northwest corner of section three (3), in township forty-five (45) north of range one hundred two (102) west; thence south along the west line of sections three (3), ten (10), fifteen (15), twenty-two (22), twenty-seven (27) and thirty-four (34), in said township forty-five (45), north of range one hundred two (102) west, to the southwest corner of section thirty-four (34); thence west along the township line, between townships forty-four (44) and forty-five (45) north, to the northern boundary line of Fremont county; thence southeasterly along the northern boundary line of Fremont county, to the middle line of the south fork of Owl Creek; thence southeasterly along the middle of said south fork of Owl Creek, to the range line between ranges three (3) and four (4) west of the Wind River meridian; thence south on said range line to the southwest corner of township eight (8) north of range three (3), west of Wind River meridian and base line; thence east on the township line between townships seven (7) and eight (8) north, to the northeast corner of township seven (7), north of range two (2) west; thence south on the range line between ranges one (1) and two (2) west, to the southwest corner of section six (6), township seven (7), north of range one (1) west; thence east along the south line of sections six (6), five (5), four (4), three (3), two (2) and one (1) to the Wind River meridian; thence south on said Wind River meridian to the southwest corner of section eighteen (18), in township seven (7), north of range one (1) east; thence east along the south line of sections eighteen (18), seventeen (17), sixteen (16), fifteen (15), fourteen (14) and thirteen (13), to the northeast corner of section nineteen (19), in township seven (7), north of range two (2) east; thence south on the range line between ranges one (1) and two (2) east, to the southwest corner of township seven (7), north of range two (2) east; thence east on the township line between townships six (6) and seven (7) north, to the northwest corner of township six (6), north of range three (3) east; thence south along the range line between ranges two (2) and three (3) east, to the southwest corner of section seven (7), in township six (6), north of range three (3) east; thence east along the south line of sections seven (7), eight (8), nine (9), ten (10), eleven (11) and twelve (12) to the southwest corner of section seven (7) in township six (6), north of range four (4) east; thence south along the range line between ranges three (3) and four (4) east to the southwest corner of section nineteen (19), in township six (6), north of range four (4) east; thence east along the south line of sections nineteen (19), twenty (20), twenty-one (21), twenty-two (22), twenty-three (23) and twenty-four (24) to the northeast corner of section twenty-five (25), in township six (6), north of range four (4) east; thence south along the range line between ranges four (4) and five (5) east, to the southwest corner of section thirty (30), in township six (6), north of range five (5) east; thence east along the south line of sections thirty (30), twenty-nine (29), twenty-eight (28), twenty-seven (27), twenty-six (26) and twenty-five (25), in the last mentioned township and range, and the south line of sections thirty (30) and twenty-nine (29), in township six (6), north of range six (6) east, in a straight line to the east boundary line of said range six (6) east; thence north, on the east boundary line of said range six (6), to the intersection with the tenth (10th) standard parallel north; thence east along said tenth (10th) standard parallel north to the southeast corner of township forty-one (41), north of range ninety (90) west; thence north along the range line between ranges eighty-nine (89) and ninety (90) west, to the northeast corner of township forty-two (42), north of range ninety (90) west; thence west along the township line between townships forty-two (42) and forty-three (43) north, to the southeast corner of township forty-three (43), north of range ninety-one (91) west; thence north along the range line between ranges ninety (90) and ninety-one (91) west, to the northeast corner of township forty-three (43), north of range ninety-one (91) west; thence west along the township line between townships forty-three (43) and forty-four (44) north to the southeast corner of township forty-four (44), north of range ninety-three (93) west; thence north along the range line between ranges ninety-two (92) and ninety-three (93) west to the northeast corner of township forty-four (44), north of range ninety-three (93) west; thence west along the township line, between townships forty-four (44) and forty-five (45) north, to its intersection with the middle line of the Big Horn River; thence northerly along the middle line of the Big Horn River to its intersection with the section line between sections nineteen (19) and thirty (30), in township forty-five (45), north of range ninety-four (94) west; thence west along said section line and the south boundary line of sections twenty-four (24), twenty-three (23), twenty-two (22), twenty-one (21), twenty (20) and nineteen (19), in township forty-five (45) north of range ninety-five (95) west, to the southwest corner of section nineteen (19), in said last mentioned township and range; thence north along the range line between ranges ninety-five (95) and ninety-six (96) west, to the northeast corner of township forty-five (45) north of range ninety-six (96) west; thence west along the township line, between townships forty-five (45) and forty-six (46) north, to the southeast corner of township forty-six (46) north of range ninety-seven (97) west; thence north along the range line, between ranges ninety-six (96) and ninety-seven (97) west, to the northeast corner of township forty-six (46), north of range ninety-seven (97) west; thence west along the township line, between townships forty-six (46) and forty-seven (47) north, to the southeast corner of section thirty-three (33), township forty-seven (47), north of range ninety-seven (97) west; thence north along the west line of sections thirty-three (33), twenty-eight (28), twenty-one (21), sixteen (16), nine (9) and four (4), in township forty-seven (47), north of range ninety-seven (97) west, to the northeast corner of section four (4), in said last mentioned township and range; thence west on the township line, between townships forty-seven (47) and forty-eight (48) north, to place of beginning.
